Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. Substantive Provisions.

Sec. 10.20.005.
Purposes.

Corporations may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose, including, but not limited to, one or more of the following: charitable; religious; benevolent; eleemosynary; educational; civic; cemetery; patriotic; political; social; fraternal; literary; cultural; athletic; scientific; agricultural; horticultural; animal husbandry; and professional, commercial, industrial, or trade association purposes.
Trade unions and other labor organizations may also be organized under this chapter, but cooperative corporations, electric and telephone cooperatives, and organizations subject to state insurance or banking laws may not be organized under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is nothing in this chapter which would prevent a nonprofit corporation organized thereunder from owning a public utility which was not operated or managed as a cooperative.
June 7, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

An electrical utility owned and operated by a regional electrical authority would continue to qualify for the broad exemption from the Alaska Public Utilities Commission Act, AS 42.05, available to political subdivisions under AS

42.05.711(b)

once the regional electrical authority had completed its proposed organization as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to this chapter.
June 7, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

Although there is no other express language in the Electric and Telephone Cooperative Act, AS 10.25, which purports to make it the exclusive means of organizing nonprofit cooperative associations for the development of utility services, this would certainly be a reasonable inference based upon AS

10.25.620

and upon the exclusionary language of this section which eliminates the nonprofit corporation as an alternative. June 7, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

A fish hatchery established as a nonprofit corporation can expand its business to other lawful purposes including processing fish harvested by others, provided that the profits from these activities are used for the business and are not distributed to members, directors or officers; for example, the money could be used to pay for the overall operations of the corporation and to establish reserves. June 11, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 27.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 53.

Sec. 10.20.007.
Corporations organized under Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act.

A village corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) may be incorporated under and subject to this chapter except the name of the corporation may not contain the word “village” or otherwise imply that the corporation is a municipal corporation; however, the name of a village may be used in the corporate name.

History.

(§ 3 ch 193 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For additional provisions relating to the relationship between this chapter and the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, see § 2, ch. 83, SLA 1973 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.20.011.
General powers.

A corporation may

have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless its duration is limited by its articles of incorporation;

sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name;

adopt and use a corporate seal or a facsimile thereof, which may be altered at pleasure, and which may be impressed or affixed or in any manner reproduced;

purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise or bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest in the property, wherever situated;

sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets;

lend money to its employees other than its officers and directors and otherwise assist its employees, officers and directors;

purchase, take, receive, subscribe to, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, associations, partnerships or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States, or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality or of any instrumentality thereof;

make contracts, incur liabilities, borrow money at rates of interests the corporation may determine, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchises and income;

lend money for its corporate purposes, invest and reinvest its funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so loaned or invested;

transact its business, carry on its operations, have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United States, or in any foreign country;

elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, who may be directors or members, define their duties and fix their compensation;

make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of the state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation;

make donations for public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes; and in time of war make donations in aid of war activities;

indemnify a director, officer or former director or officer of the corporation, or a person who has served at its request as a director or officer of another corporation in which it owns shares of capital stock or of which it is a creditor, against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by that person in connection with the defense of any action, suit or proceeding, civil or criminal, in which that person is made a party by reason of being or having been a director or officer, except in relation to matters in which that person was adjudged, in the action, suit or proceeding, to be liable for negligence or misconduct in the performance of corporate duties; and to make any other indemnification authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or resolution adopted after notice by the members entitled to vote;

pay pensions and establish pension plans or pension trusts for its directors, officers and employees;

cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise;

have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect the purposes for which the corporation is organized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.016.
Defense of ultra vires.

An act of a corporation and a conveyance or transfer of real or personal property to or by a corporation is not invalid because the corporation did not have capacity or power to perform the act or to convey or receive the property. However, lack of capacity or power may be asserted as provided in this section.

The assertion may be made in a proceeding by a member or director against the corporation to enjoin the performance of an act or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation. If the unauthorized act or transfer sought to be enjoined is being or is to be performed or made under a contract to which the corporation is a party, the court may, if the parties to the contract are parties to the proceeding and if the court considers it equitable, set aside and enjoin the performance of the contract. In so doing the court may allow compensation to the corporation or to the other parties to the contract for the loss or damage sustained by either of them resulting from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of the contract. The court may not award anticipated profits to be derived from the performance of the contract as a loss or damage sustained.

The assertion may be made in a proceeding by the corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, or through members in a representative suit, against the incumbent or former officers or directors of the corporation.

The assertion may be made in a proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve the corporation, or to enjoin the corporation from the transaction of unauthorized business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory paragraph was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (3) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (d) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.021.
Corporate name.

The name of a corporation may not contain a word or phrase that indicates or implies that it is organized for a purpose other than one or more of the purposes contained in the articles of incorporation of the corporation.

The name of the corporation must be distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this subsection. In this subsection, “organized entity” and “reserved or registered name” have the meanings given in AS

10.35.040

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 29 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 12, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 222 et seq.

18 C.J.S. Corporations, § 132 et seq.

Sec. 10.20.026.
Registered office and registered agent.

A corporation shall continuously maintain in the state a registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business, and a registered agent.
The registered agent may be either an individual resident of the state whose business office is the same as the registered office, or a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state whose business office is the same as the registered office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.031.
Filing list of corporations.

The department shall file a list of the name of each corporation, the address of the registered office and the name and address of the registered agent with each clerk of the superior court.
The department shall provide a periodic supplement to the list indicating additions, deletions and changes at least once every six months.
The commissioner shall make the list available to the public for a fee prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.036.
Change of registered office or agent.

A corporation, domestic or foreign, may change its registered office, agent, or both, by filing with the department a statement signed by the president or the vice-president setting out

the name of the corporation;

the address of its registered office;

the address of its new registered office if the registered office is to be changed;

the name of its registered agent;

the name of its new registered agent if its registered agent is to be changed;

that the change is authorized by resolution of its board of directors.

Upon finding that the statement complies with this chapter, the commissioner shall file it in the commissioner’s office. The change becomes effective when the statement is filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 70 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 28 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.041.
Change of location or resignation of registered agent.

If the registered agent of a corporation, domestic or foreign, changes the location of an office from one address to another within a city or town, or from one city or town in the state to another, the agent may change the registered office for each corporation for whom the agent is acting as registered agent by filing in the office of the commissioner a statement setting out

the name of the agent;

the address of the office before change;

the address to which the office is changed; and

a list of corporations for whom the agent is furnishing a registered office.

The statement in (a) of this section shall be executed by the registered agent in the agent’s individual name and, if the agent is a corporation, domestic or foreign, it shall be executed by its president or a vice-president. The statement shall be delivered to the commissioner who, upon finding that it complies with this chapter, shall file it in the commissioner’s office. The change becomes effective when the statement is filed.

A registered agent may resign by filing a written notice, executed in duplicate, with the commissioner. The commissioner shall immediately mail a copy of the notice to the corporation at its registered office. The appointment of the agent terminates 30 days after receipt of the notice by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 29 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.046.
Service on corporation.

The registered agent of a corporation is an agent upon whom process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

Whenever a corporation fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in the state, the commissioner is an agent of the corporation upon whom the process, notice, or demand may be served. Service is made upon the commissioner as agent by leaving with the commissioner, or with a clerk having charge of the corporation department of the commissioner’s office, duplicate copies of the process, notice or demand. When process, notice or demand is served on the commissioner, the commissioner shall immediately forward a copy of it by registered mail to the corporation at its registered office. Service on the commissioner is returnable in not less than 30 days.

The commissioner shall keep a record of processes, notices, and demands served on the commissioner. The record must show the time of service and the commissioner’s action with reference to the service.

This chapter does not limit or affect the right to serve process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.051.
Members and liability of directors, officers, employees, and members.

A corporation may have one or more classes of members or may have no members. If the corporation has one or more classes of members, the designation of the class or classes, the manner of election or appointment, and the qualifications and rights of the members of each class shall be set out in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. If the corporation has no members, that fact shall be set out in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. A corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership.

The directors, officers, employees, and members of the corporation are not, as such, liable on its obligations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.056.
Bylaws.

The board of directors shall adopt the initial bylaws of a corporation.
The power to adopt, alter, amend or repeal bylaws is vested in the board of directors unless it is reserved to the members by the articles of incorporation. The bylaws may contain provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.061.
Meetings of members.

Meetings of members may be held at a place, either inside or outside the state, which may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of such a provision, all meetings shall be held at the registered office of the corporation in the state.

An annual meeting of the members shall be held at a time provided in the bylaws. Failure to hold the annual meeting at the designated time does not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the president or by the board of directors. Special meetings of the members may also be called by such other officers, persons or number or proportion of members as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the number or proportion of members entitled to call a meeting, a special meeting of members may be called by members having one-twentieth of the votes entitled to be cast at the meeting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.066.
Notice of meetings.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, written notice stating the manner, place, if the meeting is to be held at a designated place, day, and hour of the meeting, and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than 10 nor more than 50 days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail, by or at the direction of the president, or the secretary, or the officers or persons calling the meeting, to each member entitled to vote at the meeting. If mailed, the notice shall be considered to be delivered when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the member at the member’s address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage prepaid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 21 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For a savings clause declaring that the 2021 amendment to this section does not affect a court action or court proceeding begun or to a right accrued before April 1, 2021, see sec. 29, ch. 1, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted “stating the manner, place, if the meeting is to be held at a designated place, day, and hour of the meeting,” for “stating the place, day and hour of the meeting” following “written notice”.

Editor’s notes —

Section 30, ch. 1, SLA 2021 makes the 2021 amendment to this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.20.071.
Voting; quorum.

The right of the members, or any class or classes of members, to vote may be limited, enlarged, or denied to the extent specified in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Unless limited, enlarged, or denied, each member, regardless of class, is entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members.

A member entitled to vote may vote in person or, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws otherwise provide, may vote by remote communication, by proxy executed in writing by the member or by the attorney-in-fact for the member, or by proxy executed by electronic transmission by the member or by the authorized attorney-in-fact of the member. A proxy is not valid after 11 months from the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. If directors or officers are to be elected by members, the bylaws may provide that the elections may be conducted by mail.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that in all elections for directors every member entitled to vote shall have the right to cumulate the member’s vote and to give one candidate a number of votes equal to the member’s vote multiplied by the number of directors to be elected, or by distributing the votes on the same principle among any number of the candidates.

If a corporation has no members or its members have no right to vote, the directors shall have sole voting power.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide the number or percentage of members entitled to vote represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, or the number or percentage of votes represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, which constitute a quorum at a meeting of members. In the absence of any such provision, members holding one- tenth of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter to be voted on represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy constitute a quorum. A majority of the votes entitled to be cast on a matter to be voted on by the members present or represented by proxy at a meeting at which the quorum is present is necessary for adoption unless a greater proportion is required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

A proxy executed by electronic transmission must

be directed to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation person, including a proxy support service organization or similar agent that is authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive the transmission; and

include information that demonstrates that the stockholder authorized the transmission.

In this section, “electronic transmission” has the meaning given in AS

10.06.990

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am §§ 22 — 24 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that the 2021 amendments to (b) and (e) of this section and the 2021 enactment of (f) and (g) of this section do not affect a court action or court proceeding begun or a right accrued before April 1, 2021, see sec. 29, ch. 1, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (b), inserted “remote communication, by” following “may vote by”, and added “, or by proxy executed by electronic transmission by the member or by the authorized attorney-in-fact of the member” at the end; in (e), inserted “, by remote communication,” three times following “represented in person” and made stylistic changes; added (f) and (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendments to (b) and (e) of this section and the 2021 enactment of (f) and (g) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.20.076.
Quorum of members.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, members holding one-tenth of the votes entitled to be cast, represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, constitute a quorum at a meeting of members. However, in no event may a quorum consist of less than one-tenth of the votes entitled to vote at a meeting. If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented at the meeting and entitled to vote on the subject matter is the act of the members, unless the vote of a greater number is required by this chapter or the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 25 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that the 2021 amendment to this section does not affect a court action or court proceeding begun or a right accrued before April 1, 2021, see sec. 29, ch.. 1, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in the first sentence, inserted “, by remote communication,” following “represented in person”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.20.081.
Board of directors.

The affairs of a corporation shall be managed by a board of directors.
Directors need not be residents of the state or members of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws so require. The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.086.
Number of directors.

The number of directors of a corporation shall be at least three. The number of directors shall be fixed by the bylaws, except that the number constituting the initial board of directors shall be fixed by the articles of incorporation.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to the bylaws, but a decrease may not have the effect of shortening the term of an incumbent director.

In the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, the number shall be the same as that stated in the articles of incorporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.091.
Membership and term of office of first board of directors.

The names and addresses of the members of the first board of directors shall be stated in the articles of incorporation. Each member holds office until the first annual election of directors or for the period specified in the articles of incorporation.
If no term of office is specified, a director’s term is one year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.096.
Election and terms of directors.

At the first annual election of directors and at each annual meeting thereafter the members shall elect directors to hold office for the terms provided in the bylaws.
Each director holds office for the term for which elected and until a successor is elected and qualified. The terms of office of directors may be staggered.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.101.
Vacancies.

A vacancy occurring in the board of directors and a directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum of the board of directors, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a vacancy or directorship so created shall be filled in some other manner. A director elected or appointed to fill a vacancy shall be elected or appointed for the unexpired term of the director’s predecessor in office.
A directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors shall be filled by the board of directors for a term of office which continues only until the next election of directors.
In no case may a vacancy continue for longer than six months or until the next annual meeting of the members, whichever occurs first.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 30 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Sec. 10.20.106.
Quorum of directors.

A majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws, or, in the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, the number stated in the articles of incorporation, constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business unless a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present is the act of the board of directors, unless the act of a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.111.
Executive committee.

If the articles of incorporation or the bylaws so provide, the board of directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws, or, in the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, the number stated in the articles of incorporation, may designate two or more directors to constitute an executive committee, which, to the extent provided in the resolution or in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of the corporation, may exercise the authority of the board of directors in the management of the corporation.
The designation of the executive committee and the delegation of authority to it do not relieve the board of directors or any member of the board from responsibility imposed by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.116.
Place and notice of directors’ meetings.

Regular or special meetings of the board of directors may be held at a designated place, by remote communication, or at a designated place and by remote communication. The designated place may be inside or outside the state.

Regular meetings of the board of directors may be held with or without notice as prescribed in the bylaws. Special meetings of the board of directors shall be held after the notice which shall be prescribed in the bylaws. Attendance of a director at a meeting constitutes a waiver of notice of the meeting, except when a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. The business to be transacted or the purpose of a regular or special meeting of the board of directors need not be specified in the notice of the meeting unless required by the bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 26 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that the 2021 amendment to (a) of this section does not affect a court action or court proceeding begun or a right accrued before April 1, 2021, see sec. 29, ch. 1, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, rewrote (a), which read, “Regular or special meetings of the board of directors may be held either inside or outside the state.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (a) of this section retroactive to March 1, 2020.

Sec. 10.20.121.
Officers.

The officers of a corporation consist of a president, one or more vice presidents as prescribed by the bylaws, a secretary, and a treasurer. Each of the officers shall be elected by the board of directors at the time and in the manner prescribed by the bylaws. Other necessary officers and assistant officers and agents may be elected or appointed by the board of directors or chosen in the manner prescribed by the bylaws. Two or more offices may be held by the same person, except the offices of president and secretary.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that an officer is an ex officio member of the board of directors.

An officer may be designated by additional titles as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.126.
Removal of officers.

An officer or agent may be removed by the board of directors, or by the executive committee, whenever in its judgment the best interests of the corporation will be served.
Removal is without prejudice to the contract rights of the person removed.
Election or appointment of an officer or agent does not of itself create contract rights.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.131.
Books and records; inspection.

A corporation shall keep correct and complete books and records of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its members, board of directors and committees having any of the authority of the board of directors; and shall keep at its registered office or principal office in the state a record of the names and addresses of its members entitled to vote.

All books and records of a corporation may be inspected by any member, or an agent or attorney for the member, for any proper purpose at any reasonable time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.136.
Shares of stock and dividends prohibited; compensation, benefits, and distributions.

A corporation may not have or issue shares of stock.
No dividend may be paid and no part of the income or profit of a corporation may be distributed to its members, directors, or officers.
A corporation may pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its members, directors, or officers for services rendered, may confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes, and upon dissolution or final liquidation may make distribution to its members as permitted by this chapter, and a payment, benefit, or distribution under this section may not be considered to be a dividend or a distribution of income or profit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.141.
Loans to directors and officers prohibited.

A corporation may not make loans to its directors or officers.
A director or officer who assents to or participates in the making of such a loan shall be liable to the corporation for the amount of the loan until its repayment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)